Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 98A of Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the amount “three hundred dollars” and 
replacing it with “five hundred dollars for the first offense, seven hundred dollars for the second 
offense, and one thousand dollars for the third offense and every subsequent offense”. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
Section 98A the following section: 
Section 98A1/2. Any individual with a disability who is accompanied by a service dog 
that is denied access to any place of public accommodation will have the ability to request local 
law enforcement to:  
(a) inform the business owner or agent of the legal obligations under Section 98A and 
the Americans with Disabilities Act; 

of 2 12  (b) direct the business owner or agent to permit entry to the individual with a service 
dog unless a lawful exception applies; 
(c) issue a written warning or citation for violations established by the executive 
office of public safety and security; 
The Executive Office of Public Safety and Security shall develop and implement training 
for all law enforcement officers regarding the rights of individuals with service dogs and the 
procedures set forth in this section.